Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-208.01
School or college of barbering;
payment of wages, commissions, or gratuities forbidden; operation of barber
shop in connection with school or college, prohibited.

No
school or college of barbering shall be approved by the Board of Barber Examiners
which shall pay any wages, commissions, or gratuities of any kind to barber
students for barber work while in training or while enrolled as students in
such school or college. No barber shop shall be operated
by or in connection with any barber school or college.

Laws 1945, c. 166, § 1(2), p. 533;

Laws 1957, c. 294, § 4, p. 1054;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB46, § 2.